District of Columbia statutes.
7-1104

Discharge of financial obligations.

The Compact Administrator, subject to the approval of the Mayor or his designated agent, may make or arrange for any payments necessary to discharge any financial obligations imposed upon the District of Columbia by the Compact or by any supplementary agreement entered into thereunder.

History

Apr. 26, 1972, 86 Stat. 131, Pub. L. 92-280, § 5

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1804.
1973 Ed., § 6-1604.

References in Text

The “Compact,” referred to near the end of the section, is set forth in § 7-1101.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.